Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-191.11
Burden of proof.

In any proceeding under the provisions of sections 45-189 to 45-191.11, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition shall be upon the person claiming it.

Laws 1993, LB 270, § 13.